Vermont, session 2025-2026, H631.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 30 V.S.A. § 256 is added to read:
§ 256. ENERGY STORAGE GOALS
(a) It shall be the goals of the State to:
(1) develop 200 MW of installed capacity of energy storage facilities
within the State on or before January 1, 2030;
(2) develop 450 MW of installed capacity of energy storage facilities
within the State on or before January 1, 2035; and
(3) develop 800 MW of installed capacity of energy storage facilities
within the State on or before January 1, 2040.
VT LEG #386306 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.631
2026 Page 2 of 2
(b) The Department of Public Service shall include in the Comprehensive
Energy Plan progress towards meeting the goals established in this section.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386306 v.2